Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2785.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 34.401 of Title 62, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
In addition to other duties imposed upon the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services (OMES) by law, the Director of
the Office of Management and Enterprise Services shall ensure that
the following procedures are strictly adhered to with respect to the
Oklahoma Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services:
1. In accordance with paragraph 3 of subsection A of Section
34.6 of this title, prior to releasing the one-twelfth (1/12)
appropriations disbursement, OMES shall conduct a review of the
agency's budget to actuals to ensure the agency is staying within
budget constraints;

2. OMES shall provide a report to the Governor, the Speaker of
the Oklahoma House of Representatives, the President Pro Tempore of
the Oklahoma State Senate, and the chairs and vice-chairs of the
standing committees of the Oklahoma House of Representatives and the
Oklahoma State Senate having primary responsibility for the
consideration of agency appropriations concerning the status of
revenue and expenditures of the agency;
3. The Oklahoma Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse
Services shall be prohibited from entering into contracts that do
not clearly state a maximum fiscal obligation;
4. OMES shall review encumbrances for any multi-year purchase
orders or contracts to ensure that only the anticipated amount of
funds for the current fiscal year are encumbered; and
5. OMES shall prohibit the processing of payments for non-
budgeted expenditures.
SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. H. B. NO. 2785 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 20th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 22nd day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 2785 Page 3